Louisiana, session 2026, SB275.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1037.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1037.1. Health insurance coverage for healthcare services performed by
certified registered nurse anesthetists
A. For any healthcare service personally performed by a certified
registered nurse anesthetist (CRNA) without medical direction from a physician
or dentist, as billed per the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services
Medicare Part B regulations, and within the CRNA's lawful scope of practice,
the allowed amount of reimbursement shall be no less than the allowed amount
the insurer would reimburse for the same service when personally performed
by a physician, regardless of billing modifier or coding designation used to
identify the provider of the service.
B. An insurer shall not deny participation or network inclusion to a
CRNA solely on the basis of provider type or licensure.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to expand or limit the scope
of practice of any licensed healthcare professional.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 275 ENROLLED
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to any new policy, contract,
program, or health coverage plan issued on or after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract,
or health coverage plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the
provisions of this Act on or before the renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2028.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.